Maryland, session 2025, HB0429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0429*

HOUSE BILL 429
19–1408.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Department shall make a
site visit and conduct a full survey of each licensed nursing home at least once per calendar
year.
(2) Unless otherwise required by federal law, all surveys shall be
unannounced.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department shall
initiate an investigation of a nursing home complaint alleging actual harm within 10
business days after receiving the complaint.
(2) If the Department receives a complaint against a nursing home alleging
immediate jeopardy to a resident, the Department:
(i) Shall make every effort to investigate the complaint within 24
hours after receiving the complaint; and
(ii) Shall investigate the complaint not later than 48 hours after
receiving the complaint.
(c) If ownership of a licensed nursing home is transferred to a person that does
not own or operate another nursing home in the State at the time of the transfer, the
Department shall conduct:
(1) The first full survey of the licensed nursing home as required under
subsection (a) of this section within 3 months after the date of transfer; and
(2) An unannounced, on–site follow–up survey of the licensed nursing
home that covers any deficiencies noted in the full survey within 120 days after the full
survey was completed.
(D) (1) ON REQUEST OF A COUNTY, THE SECRETARY SHALL DELEGATE TO
THE COUNTY THE AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT SITE VISITS AND FULL SURVEYS OF
NURSING HOMES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COUNTY SHALL EQUALLY SHARE THE
COSTS OF CONDUCTING SITE VISITS AND FULL SURVEYS DELEGATED BY THE
SECRETARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF BY JULY 1,
2026, THE DEPARTMENT IS 6 MONTHS OR MORE BEHIND THE FEDERAL
REQUIREMENT OF CONDUCTING NURSING HOME SURVEYS EVERY 15.9 MONTHS
ACCORDING TO THE DEPARTMENT’S MOST RECENT DATA, ON REQUEST OF A

HOUSE BILL 429 3
COUNTY, THE SECRETARY SHALL DELEGATE TO THE COUNTY THE AUTHORITY TO
AUGMENT STATE NURSING HOME SURVEY STAFF USING COUNTY FUNDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER A COUNTY MAKES A REQUEST UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) INITIATE A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COUNTY TO USE COUNTY FUNDS TO CONDUCT SURVEYS AND COMPLAINT
INVESTIGATIONS OF NURSING HOMES; AND
(II) DEVELOP A PLAN WITH THE COUNTY ON HOW TO
IMPLEMENT THE AUGMENTATION OF STAFF.
(3) A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING INITIATED OR A PLAN OF
ACTION DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT RESTRICT A COUNTY’S
PROGRESSION TO THE NEXT SURVEY TIER IF AN EXEMPTION FROM THE TIERS IS
AUTHORIZED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES FOR
NURSING HOMES.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF THE REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 19–308(B)(4) OF THIS TITLE AND § 19–1409(E) OF THIS
SUBTITLE:
(I) EACH MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING INITIATED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF SURVEYS COMPLETED UNDER THE
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING INITIATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, AND EVERY 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO EACH AREA AGENCY ON AGING:
(1) THE NAMES OF EACH NURSING HOME SURVEYED BY THE STATE
AND THE DATES OF EACH STATE SURVEY COMPLETED IN THE COUNTY DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6 MONTHS; AND
(2) THE AVERAGE STATEWIDE INTERVAL IN MONTHS BETWEEN
REQUIRED RECERTIFICATION SURVEYS AS COMPARED WITH THE FEDERAL
REQUIREMENT OF 15.9 MONTHS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.